Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1603
Right to cancel; manner of cancellation.

(1) In addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, to rescind the transaction or to exercise any remedy for the seller's breach, a buyer may cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the seller has given notice to the buyer in accordance with section 69-1604.

(2) Notice of cancellation shall be by mail addressed to the seller and shall be considered given at the time mailed.

(3) Notice of cancellation by the buyer need not take a particular form and is sufficient if it indicates by any form of written expression the intention of the buyer not to be bound by such home solicitation sale.

Laws 1974, LB 212, § 3.

For the purposes of this section, "business day" is defined as any calendar day except Sunday or any federal holiday. Flodman v. Robinson, 22 Neb. App. 943, 864 N.W.2d 716 (2015).